Connecticut, session 2026, SB00022.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of three hundred thousand dollars be appropriated to
the Department of Children and Families, from the General Fund, for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the youth service bureaus
enhancement grant program established under section 10-19q of the
general statutes.